Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The directors of each of the following state agencies shall consult  and co-
operate with each other to develop a pilot program within each respective  agency to provide
an optional procedure whereby  an employee may anonymously disclose information under
ORS 659A.203 (1)(b):
(1) The Oregon Health Authority;
(2) The Department of Transportation;
(3) The Department of Human Services; and
(4) The Department of Environmental Quality.
SECTION 2.
Sections 3 and 4 of this  2018 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
659A.200 to 659A.224.
SECTION 3. (1) The Bureau of Labor  and Industries shall adopt a uniform standards and
procedures manual that provides guidelines for implementing ORS 659A.200 to 659A.224.
(2) The bureau shall make the manual available to the public on the bureau’s website.
(3) The manual must include, but need not be limited to, the following information:
(a) Proper procedures for disclosing information under ORS 659A.200 to 659A.224;
(b) The rights and remedies provided to an employee who  discloses information under
ORS 659A.200 to 659A.224; and
(c) The implementation of statutes and rules relating to  protected activity under ORS
659A.200 to 659A.224 as interpreted by the case law of this state.
(4) The bureau shall review  the manual on a periodic basis and make updates as neces-
sary to reflect recent changes in rule or law,  including case law, regarding disclosures of
information under ORS 659A.200 to 659A.224.
SECTION 4.
(1) The Bureau of Labor and Industries, in consultation and cooperation with
the agencies described in subsection (2)  of this section, shall collect and compile information
and data relating to disclosures of information made under ORS  659A.200 to 659A.224. The
information and data shall include:
(a) The total number of disclosures made by an  employee to a public employer pursuant
to ORS 659A.221 of matters described in ORS 659A.203 (1)(b); and
(b) The total number of all reports of violations of ORS 659A.203 or 659A.218.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section applies to the following agencies:
(a) The Oregon Health Authority;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1559 (SB 1559-B) Page 1
(b) The Department of Transportation;
(c) The Department of Human Services; and
(d) The Department of Environmental Quality.
(3) No later than January 1 of each  odd-numbered year, the bureau shall submit to the
Governor, and, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, to an appropriate committee or  in-
terim committee of the Legislative Assembly, a  written report that includes the information
and data described in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 5.
Section 1 of this 2018 Act is repealed on January 2, 2021.
Passed by Senate March 1, 2018
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House March 3, 2018
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1559 (SB 1559-B) Page 2